Hawaii statutes.
[§155-33] Powers
of the department. The department shall have the following powers:

(1) Make loans and expend funds to finance the
purchase or installation of water infrastructure equipment for dams,
reservoirs, hydroelectric pumping, storm water reclamation, ditch maintenance,
spillways, wells, water ducts, and water distribution systems;

(2) Hold and invest moneys in the water
infrastructure special fund in investments as permitted by law;

(3) Hire employees necessary to perform its duties;

(4) Enter into contracts for the service of
consultants for rendering professional and technical assistance and advice, and
any other contracts that are necessary and proper for the implementation of the
loan program;

(5) Enter into contracts for the administration of
the loan program, in accordance with chapter 103D;

(6) Establish loan program guidelines to carry out
the purposes of this part;

(7) Perform all functions necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this part;

(8) Delegate authority to the chairperson of the
board of agriculture to approve loans where the requested amount plus any
principal balance on existing loans to the applicant does not exceed $25,000 of
state funds; and

(9) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for
the purpose of this part. [L 2016, c 171, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next